Alaska, session 34, HB283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in sec. 2 of this Act to the agencies named for the 03 purposes expressed for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026, 04 unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Medicaid Services 36,436,800 36,436,800 11 Medicaid Services 36,436,800 12 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Health 05 1003 General Fund Match 36,436,800 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 36,436,800 07 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 36,436,800 08 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1003 General Fund Match 36,436,800 06 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 36,436,800 07 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 5 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Federal Program Match 69,695,087 69,695,087 10 Federal-Aid Highway State 58,276,155 11 Match (HD 1-40) 12 Other Federal Program Match 1,611,548 13 (HD 1-40) 14 Federal-Aid Aviation State 9,807,384 15 Match (HD 1-40) 16 Statewide Federal Programs 459,000 459,000 17 Federal Transit 400,000 18 Administration Grants (HD 19 1-40) 20 Highway Safety Grants 59,000 21 Program (HD 1-40) 22 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 05 1003 General Fund Match 69,695,087 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 459,000 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 70,154,087 08 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 70,154,087 09 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1003 General Fund Match 69,695,087 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 459,000 07 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 70,154,087 08 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 02 DEVELOPMENT. The unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be $650,000, of 03 the appropriation made in sec. 14, ch. 11, SLA 2022, page 117, lines 19 - 20 (Department of 04 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy Authority, electrical 05 vehicle infrastructure plan - $1,500,000), is reappropriated to the Department of Commerce, 06 Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy Authority, for federal matching of 07 the United States Department of Energy State Energy Program. 08 * Sec. 8. FUND CAPITALIZATION. (a) The sum of $40,000,000 is appropriated from the 09 general fund to the disaster relief fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 10 (b) The sum of $55,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the fire 11 suppression fund (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities. 12 * Sec. 9. FUND TRANSFERS. (a) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and 13 hazardous substance release prevention account (AS 46.08.010(a)(1)) in the oil and hazardous 14 substance release prevention and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the sources indicated: 15 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 16 mitigation account (AS 46.08.020(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2026, estimated to be 17 $1,528,300, not otherwise appropriated by this Act; 18 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to 19 be $6,080,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.300; and 20 (3) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to 21 be $6,100,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.40.005. 22 (b) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 23 response account (AS 46.08.010(a)(2)) in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 24 and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the following sources: 25 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release response mitigation 26 account (AS 46.08.025(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2026, estimated to be $700,000, 27 not otherwise appropriated by this Act; and 28 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to 29 be $1,520,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.201. 30 (c) The sum of $129,598,900 is appropriated from the general fund to the Alaska 31 higher education investment fund (AS 37.14.750). 01 * Sec. 10. CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. (a) If the unrestricted state 02 revenue available for appropriation in fiscal year 2026 is insufficient to cover the general fund 03 appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2026, the amount necessary to balance revenue 04 and general fund appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2026 or to prevent a cash 05 deficiency in the general fund in fiscal year 2026, not to exceed $382,300,000, is appropriated 06 to the general fund from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of 07 Alaska) as follows: 08 (1) the amount necessary to balance revenue and general fund appropriations 09 that take effect in fiscal year 2026 that were passed by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State 10 Legislature in the First Regular Session and enacted into law; 11 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 12 subsection, to balance revenue and general fund appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 13 2026 that are made in this Act, as passed by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the 14 Second Regular Session and enacted into law; 15 (3) the amount necessary, after the appropriations made in (1) and (2) of this 16 subsection, to balance revenue and all other general fund appropriations that take effect in 17 fiscal year 2026 and to prevent a cash deficiency in the general fund in fiscal year 2026. 18 (b) The appropriations made from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, 19 Constitution of the State of Alaska) in (a) of this section are made under art. IX, sec. 17(c), 20 Constitution of the State of Alaska. 21 * Sec. 11. LAPSE. (a) The appropriations made in secs. 4 - 7 of this Act are for capital 22 projects and lapse under AS 37.25.020. 23 (b) The appropriations made in secs. 8 and 9 of this Act are for the capitalization of 24 funds and do not lapse. 25 * Sec. 12. Sections 7 and 9(a) and (b) of this Act take effect June 30, 2026. 26 * Sec. 13. Except as provided in sec. 12 of this Act, this Act takes effect immediately under 27 AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.